Utah statutes.
57-8-35.   Effect of other laws -- Compliance with ordinances and codes --
Approval of projects by municipality or county.
(1)  The provisions of this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to
all other provisions of law, statutory or judicially declared, provided that
wherever the application of the provisions of this chapter conflict with the
application of such other provisions, this chapter shall prevail: provided
further, for purposes of Sections 10-9a-604, 10-9a-611, and 17-27a-603 and
provisions of similar import and any law or ordinance adopted pursuant
thereto, a condominium project shall be considered to be a subdivision, and a
condominium plat or supplement thereto prepared pursuant to this chapter shall
be considered to be a subdivision map or plat, only with respect to:
(a)  such real property or improvements, if any, as are intended to be
dedicated to the use of the public in connection with the creation of the
condominium project or portion thereof concerned; and
(b)  those units, if any, included in the condominium project or portion
thereof concerned which are not contained in existing or proposed buildings.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to state or imply that a
condominium project, unit, association or unit owners, or management committee
is exempt by this chapter from compliance with the zoning ordinance, building
and sanitary codes, and similar development regulations which have been
adopted by a municipality or county.  No condominium project or any use within
said project or any unit or parcel or parcel of land indicated as a separate
unit or any structure within said project shall be permitted which is not in
compliance with said ordinances and codes.
(3)  From and after the time a municipality or county shall have established a
planning commission, no condominium project or any condominium plat,
declaration, or other material as required for recordation under this chapter
shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder unless and until the
following mentioned attributes of said condominium project shall have been
approved by the municipality or county in which it is located.  In order to
more fully avail itself of this power, the legislative body of a municipality
or county may provide by ordinance for the approval of condominium projects
proposed within its limits.  This ordinance may include and shall be limited
to a procedure for approval of condominium projects, the standards and the
criteria for the geographical layout of a condominium project, facilities for
utility lines and roads which shall be constructed, the percentage of the
project which must be devoted to common or recreational use, and the content
of the declaration with respect to the standards which must be adhered to
concerning maintenance, upkeep, and operation of any roads, utility
facilities, recreational areas, and open spaces included in the project.
(4)  Any ordinance adopted by the legislative body of a municipality or county
which outlines the procedures for approval of a condominium project shall
provide for:
(a)  a preliminary approval, which, among other things, will then authorize
the developer of the condominium project to proceed with the project; and
(b)  a final approval which will certify that all of the requirements set
forth in the preliminary approval either have been accomplished or have been
assured of accomplishment by bond or other appropriate means.  No declaration
or condominium plat shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder
until a final approval has been granted.
